North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7B. Juvenile Code.
Article 9. Dispositions.

§ 7B-900.
Purpose.

The purpose of dispositions in juvenile actions is to design an appropriate plan to meet the needs of the juvenile and to achieve the objectives of the State in exercising jurisdiction. If possible, the initial approach should involve working with the juvenile and the juvenile’s family in their own home so that the appropriate community resources may be involved in care, supervision, and treatment according to the needs of the juvenile. Thus, the court should arrange for appropriate community-level services to be provided to the juvenile and the juvenile’s family in order to strengthen the home situation.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 609, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6; 1999-456, s. 60.

§ 7B-900.1.
Post adjudication venue.

At any time after adjudication, the court on its own motion or motion of any party may transfer venue to a different county, regardless of whether the action could have been commenced in that county, if the court finds that the forum is inconvenient, that transfer of the action to the other county is in the best interest of the juvenile, and that the rights of the parties are not prejudiced by the change of venue.

Before ordering that a case be transferred to another county, the court shall find that the director of the department of social services in the county in which the action is pending and the director in the county to which transfer is contemplated have communicated about the case and that:

The two directors are in agreement with respect to each county’s responsibility for providing financial support for the juvenile and services for the juvenile and the juvenile’s family; or

The Director of the Division of Social Services or the Director’s designee has made that determination pursuant to G.S. 153A-257(d).

When the court transfers a case to a different county, the court shall join or substitute as a party to the action the director of the department of social services in the county to which the case is being transferred and, if the juvenile is in the custody of the department of social services in the county in which the action is pending, shall transfer custody to the department of social services in the county to which the case is being transferred. The director of the department of social services in the county to which the case is being transferred must be given notice and an opportunity to be heard before the court enters an order pursuant to this subsection. However, the director may waive the right to notice and a hearing.

Before ordering that a case be transferred to a different district, the court shall communicate with the chief district court judge or a judge presiding in juvenile court in the district to which the transfer is contemplated explaining the reasons for the proposed transfer. If the judge in the district to which the transfer is proposed makes a timely objection to the transfer, either verbally or in writing, the court shall order the transfer only after making detailed findings of fact that support a conclusion that the juvenile’s best interests require that the case be transferred.

Before ordering that a case be transferred to another county, the court shall consider relevant factors, which may include:

The current residences of the juvenile and the parent, guardian, or custodian and the extent to which those residences have been and are likely to be stable.

The reunification plan or other permanent plan for the juvenile and the likely effect of a change in venue on efforts to achieve permanence for the juvenile expeditiously.

The nature and location of services and service providers necessary to achieve the reunification plan or other permanent plan for the juvenile.

The impact upon the juvenile of the potential disruption of an existing therapeutic relationship.

The nature and location of witnesses and evidence likely to be required in future hearings.

The degree to which the transfer would cause inconvenience to one or more parties.

Any agreement of the parties as to which forum is most convenient.

The familiarity of the departments of social services, the courts, and the local offices of the guardian ad litem with the juvenile and the juvenile’s family.

Any other factor the court considers relevant.

The order transferring venue shall be in writing, signed, and entered no later than 30 days from completion of the hearing. The order shall identify the next court action and specify the date within which the next hearing shall be held. If the order is not entered within 30 days following completion of the hearing, the clerk of court for juvenile matters shall schedule a subsequent hearing at the first session of court scheduled for the hearing of juvenile matters following the 30-day period to determine and explain the reason for the delay and to obtain any needed clarification as to the contents of the order. The order shall be entered within 10 days of the subsequent hearing required by this subsection.

The clerk shall transmit to the court in the county to which the case is being transferred a copy of the complete record of the case within three business days after entry of the order transferring venue.Upon receiving a case that has been transferred from another county, the clerk shall promptly satisfy the following:

Assign an appropriate file number to the case.

Ensure that any necessary appointments of new attorneys or guardians ad litem are made.

Calendar the next court action as set forth in the order transferring venue and give appropriate notice to all parties.

History.

2009-311, s. 5.

Cross References.

As to venue in juvenile proceedings, generally, see

G.S. 7B-400

.

§ 7B-901.
Initial dispositional hearing.

The dispositional hearing shall take place immediately following the adjudicatory hearing and shall be concluded within 30 days of the conclusion of the adjudicatory hearing. The dispositional hearing may be informal and the court may consider written reports or other evidence concerning the needs of the juvenile. The juvenile and the juvenile’s parent, guardian, or custodian shall have the right to present evidence, and they may advise the court concerning the disposition they believe to be in the best interests of the juvenile. The court may consider any evidence, including hearsay evidence as defined in

G.S. 8C-1

, Rule 801, including testimony or evidence from any person who is not a party, that the court finds to be relevant, reliable, and necessary to determine the needs of the juvenile and the most appropriate disposition.

At the dispositional hearing, the court shall inquire as to the identity and location of any missing parent and whether paternity is at issue. The court shall include findings of the efforts undertaken to locate the missing parent and to serve that parent and efforts undertaken to establish paternity when paternity is an issue. The order may provide for specific efforts in determining the identity and location of any missing parent and specific efforts in establishing paternity. The court shall also inquire about efforts made to identify and notify relatives, parents, or other persons with legal custody of a sibling of the juvenile, as potential resources for placement or support.

If the disposition order places a juvenile in the custody of a county department of social services, the court shall direct that reasonable efforts for reunification as defined in

G.S. 7B-101

shall not be required if the court makes written findings of fact pertaining to any of the following, unless the court concludes that there is compelling evidence warranting continued reunification efforts:

A court of competent jurisdiction determines or has determined that aggravated circumstances exist because the parent has committed or encouraged the commission of, or allowed the continuation of, any of the following upon the juvenile:

Sexual abuse.

Chronic physical or emotional abuse.

Torture.

Abandonment.

Chronic or toxic exposure to alcohol or controlled substances that causes impairment of or addiction in the juvenile.

Any other act, practice, or conduct that increased the enormity or added to the injurious consequences of the abuse or neglect.

A court of competent jurisdiction has terminated involuntarily the parental rights of the parent to another child of the parent.

A court of competent jurisdiction determines or has determined that (i) the parent has committed murder or voluntary manslaughter of another child of the parent; (ii) has aided, abetted, attempted, conspired, or solicited to commit murder or voluntary manslaughter of the child or another child of the parent; (iii) has committed a felony assault resulting in serious bodily injury to the child or another child of the parent; (iv) has committed sexual abuse against the child or another child of the parent; or (v) has been required to register as a sex offender on any government-administered registry.

When the court determines that reunification efforts are not required, the court shall order concurrent permanent plans as soon as possible, after providing each party with a reasonable opportunity to prepare and present evidence. The court shall schedule a permanency planning hearing within 30 days to address the permanent plans in accordance with

G.S. 7B-906.1

and

G.S. 7B-906.2

.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1981, c. 469, s. 18; 1998-202, s. 6; 1999-456, s. 60; 2003-62, s. 1; 2005-398, s. 4; 2007-276, s. 2; 2011-295, s. 7; 2013-129, s. 22; 2015-135, s. 2.4; 2015-136, s. 9; 2015-264, s. 34(a); 2016-94, s. 12C.1(g); 2018-86, s. 2; 2019-33, s. 8; 2021-100, s. 5.

§ 7B-902.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-295, s. 8, effective October 1, 2011, and applicable to actions filed on or pending on or after that date.

History.

1981, c. 371, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6; 1999-456, s. 60; repealed by Session Laws 2011-295, s. 8, effective October 1, 2011.

§ 7B-903.
Dispositional alternatives for abused, neglected, or dependent juvenile.

The following alternatives for disposition shall be available to any court exercising jurisdiction, and the court may combine any of the applicable alternatives when the court finds the disposition to be in the best interests of the juvenile:

Dismiss the case or continue the case in order to allow the parent, guardian, custodian, caretaker or others to take appropriate action.

Require that the juvenile be supervised in the juvenile’s own home by the department of social services in the juvenile’s county or by another individual as may be available to the court, subject to conditions applicable to the parent, guardian, custodian, or caretaker as the court may specify.

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-136, s. 10, effective October 1, 2015, and applicable to actions filed or pending on or after that date.

Place the juvenile in the custody of a parent, relative, private agency offering placement services, or some other suitable person. If the court determines that the juvenile should be placed in the custody of an individual other than a parent, the court shall verify that the person receiving custody of the juvenile understands the legal significance of the placement and will have adequate resources to care appropriately for the juvenile. The fact that the prospective custodian has provided a stable placement for the juvenile for at least six consecutive months is evidence that the person has adequate resources.

Appoint a guardian of the person for the juvenile as provided in

G.S. 7B-600

.

Place the juvenile in the custody of the department of social services in the county of the juvenile’s residence. In the case of a juvenile who has legal residence outside the State, the court may place the juvenile in the physical custody of the department of social services in the county where the juvenile is found so that agency may return the juvenile to the responsible authorities in the juvenile’s home state.

(a1)

In placing a juvenile in out-of-home care under this section, the court shall first consider whether a relative of the juvenile is willing and able to provide proper care and supervision of the juvenile in a safe home. If the court finds that the relative is willing and able to provide proper care and supervision in a safe home, then the court shall order placement of the juvenile with the relative unless the court finds that the placement is contrary to the best interests of the juvenile. In placing a juvenile in out-of-home care under this section, the court shall also consider whether it is in the juvenile’s best interest to remain in the juvenile’s community of residence. Placement of a juvenile with a relative outside of this State must be in accordance with the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children.

(a2)

An order under this section placing or continuing the placement of the juvenile in out-of-home care shall contain a finding that the juvenile’s continuation in or return to the juvenile’s own home would be contrary to the juvenile’s health and safety.

(a3)

An order under this section placing the juvenile in out-of-home care shall contain specific findings as to whether the department has made reasonable efforts to prevent the need for placement of the juvenile. In determining whether efforts to prevent the placement of the juvenile were reasonable, the juvenile’s health and safety shall be the paramount concern.The court may find that efforts to prevent the need for the juvenile’s placement were precluded by an immediate threat of harm to the juvenile. A finding that reasonable efforts were not made by a county department of social services shall not preclude the entry of an order authorizing the juvenile’s placement when the court finds that placement is necessary for the protection of the juvenile.

(a4)

If the court does not place the juvenile with a relative, the court may consider whether nonrelative kin or other persons with legal custody of a sibling of the juvenile are willing and able to provide proper care and supervision of the juvenile in a safe home. The court may order the department to notify the juvenile’s State-recognized tribe of the need for custodial care for the purpose of locating relatives or nonrelative kin for placement. The court may order placement of the juvenile with nonrelative kin if the court finds the placement is in the juvenile’s best interests.

When the court has found that a juvenile has suffered physical abuse and that the individual responsible for the abuse has a history of violent behavior against people, the court shall consider the opinion of the mental health professional who performed an evaluation under G.S. 7B-503(b) before returning the juvenile to the custody of that individual.

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-136, s. 10, effective October 1, 2015, and applicable to actions filed or pending on or after that date.

The court may order that the juvenile be examined by a physician, psychiatrist, psychologist, or other qualified expert as may be needed for the court to determine the needs of the juvenile. Upon completion of the examination, the court shall conduct a hearing to determine whether the juvenile is in need of medical, surgical, psychiatric, psychological, or other treatment and who should pay the cost of the treatment. The county manager, or such person who shall be designated by the chairman of the county commissioners, of the juvenile’s residence shall be notified of the hearing and allowed to be heard. Subject to

G.S. 7B-903.1

, if the court finds the juvenile to be in need of medical, surgical, psychiatric, psychological, or other treatment, the court shall permit the parent or other responsible persons to arrange for treatment. If the parent declines or is unable to make necessary arrangements, the court may order the needed treatment, surgery, or care and the court may order the parent to pay the cost of the care pursuant to

G.S. 7B-904

. If the court finds the parent is unable to pay the cost of treatment, the court shall order the county to arrange for treatment of the juvenile and to pay for the cost of the treatment. The county department of social services shall recommend the facility that will provide the juvenile with treatment.

If the court determines that the juvenile may be mentally ill or developmentally disabled, the court may order the county department of social services to coordinate with the appropriate representative of the area mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services authority or other managed care organization responsible for managing public funds for mental health and developmental disabilities to develop a treatment plan for the juvenile. The court shall not commit a juvenile directly to a State hospital or developmental center for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities and orders purporting to commit a juvenile directly to a State hospital or developmental center for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities shall be void and of no effect. If the court determines that institutionalization is the best service for the juvenile, admission shall be with the voluntary consent of the parent, guardian, or custodian. If the parent, guardian, or custodian refuses to consent to admission to a mental hospital or developmental center for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities, the signature and consent of the court may be substituted for that purpose. A State hospital or developmental center for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities that refuses admission to a juvenile referred for admission by a court, or discharges a juvenile previously admitted on court referral prior to completion of treatment, shall submit to the court a written report setting out the reasons for denial of admission or discharge and setting out the juvenile’s diagnosis, indications of mental illness or intellectual and developmental disabilities, indications of need for treatment, and a statement as to the location of any facility known to have a treatment program for the juvenile in question.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1981, c. 469, s. 19; 1985, c. 589, s. 5; c. 777, s. 1; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 863, s. 2; 1991, c. 636, s. 19(a); 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 609, s. 3; 1997-516, s. 1A; 1998-202, s. 6; 1998-229, ss. 6, 23; 1999-318, s. 6; 1999-456, s. 60; 2002-164, s. 4.8; 2003-140, s. 9(b); 2015-136, s. 10; 2019-33, s. 7(b); 2021-132, s. 1(e).

§ 7B-903.1.
Juvenile placed in custody of a department of social services.

Except as prohibited by federal law, the director of a county department of social services with custody of a juvenile shall be authorized to make decisions about matters not addressed herein that are generally made by a juvenile’s custodian, including, but not limited to, educational decisions and consenting to the sharing of the juvenile’s information. The court may delegate any part of this authority to the juvenile’s parent, foster parent, or another individual.

When a juvenile is in the custody or placement responsibility of a county department of social services, the placement provider may, in accordance with

G.S. 131D-10.2

A, provide or withhold permission, without prior approval of the court or county department of social services, to allow a juvenile to participate in normal childhood activities. If such authorization is not in the juvenile’s best interest, the court shall set out alternative parameters for approving normal childhood activities.

If a juvenile is removed from the home and placed in the custody or placement responsibility of a county department of social services, the director shall not allow unsupervised visitation with or return physical custody of the juvenile to the parent, guardian, custodian, or caretaker without a hearing at which the court finds that the juvenile will receive proper care and supervision in a safe home. Before a county department of social services may recommend unsupervised visits or return of physical custody of the juvenile to the parent, guardian, custodian, or caretaker from whom the juvenile was removed, a county department of social services shall first observe that parent, guardian, custodian, or caretaker with the juvenile for at least two visits that support the recommendation. Each observation visit shall consist of an observation of not less than one hour with the juvenile, shall be conducted at least seven days apart, and shall occur within 30 days of the hearing at which the department of social services makes the recommendation. A department of social services shall provide documentation of any observation visits that it conducts to the court for its consideration as to whether unsupervised visits or physical custody should be granted to the parent, guardian, custodian, or caretaker from whom the juvenile was removed.

(c1)

If juvenile siblings are removed from the home and placed in the nonsecure custody of a county department of social services, the director shall make reasonable efforts to place the juvenile siblings in the same home. The director is not required to make reasonable efforts under this subsection if the director documents that placing the juvenile siblings would be contrary to the safety or well-being of any of the juvenile siblings. If, after making reasonable efforts, the director is unable to place the juvenile siblings in the same home, the director shall make reasonable efforts to provide frequent sibling visitation and ongoing interaction between the juvenile siblings, unless the director documents that frequent visitation or other ongoing interaction between the juvenile siblings would be contrary to the safety or well-being of any of the juvenile siblings.

When a county department of social services having custody or placement responsibility of a juvenile intends to change the juvenile’s placement, the department shall give the guardian ad litem for the juvenile notice of its intention unless precluded by emergency circumstances from doing so. Where emergency circumstances exist, the department of social services shall notify the guardian ad litem or the attorney advocate within 72 hours of the placement change, unless local rules require notification within a shorter time period.

When a juvenile is placed in the custody of a county department of social services, the provisions of

G.S. 7B-505.1

apply.

History.

2015-135, s. 2.5; 2015-136, s. 11; 2017-41, s. 10; 2021-100, s. 6; 2021-132, s. 1(f).

§ 7B-903.2.
Emergency motion for placement and payment.

If the requirements of G.S. 122C-142.2(b) through (f) are not satisfied, a party to the juvenile case, the Department of Health and Human Services, the hospital where the juvenile is currently located, the local management entity/managed care organization, or the prepaid health plan may make a limited appearance for the sole purpose of filing a motion in the district court in the county with jurisdiction over the juvenile in the abuse, neglect, and dependency matter regarding the juvenile’s continued stay in an emergency department or subsequent admission at the hospital.

The motion shall contain a specific description of the requirements of G.S. 122C-142.2(b) through (f) which were not satisfied.

The motion shall be served on all parties to the juvenile proceeding pursuant to

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 5. The motion shall also be served upon the hospital where the juvenile is receiving services, the local management entity/managed care organization or prepaid health plan for the juvenile, and the Department of Health and Human Services. The hospital, the local management entity/managed care organization or prepaid health plan for the juvenile, and the Department of Health and Human Services, upon service of the motion, shall automatically become a party to the juvenile proceeding for the limited purpose of participating in hearings held in relation to and for complying with orders entered by the court pursuant to this section.

Upon request of the movant, the department of social services shall provide the movant with the case file number, the juvenile’s name, and the addresses of all parties and attorneys in the juvenile matter, to the extent necessary to effectuate service pursuant to subsection (c) of this section. Nothing in this section shall require the department of social services to provide the name and address of the juvenile who is a party to the action.

The motion shall be heard in the district court with jurisdiction over the juvenile in the abuse, neglect, and dependency matter. The rules of evidence in civil cases shall apply. Any person or party served with notice of the motion pursuant to subsection (b) of this section may request to be heard by the court and present evidence. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with

G.S. 7B-801

.

The court shall make written findings of fact and conclusions of law, including whether:

The movant established by clear and convincing evidence that there is no medical necessity for the juvenile to remain in the hospital.

The responsible party has not satisfied the requirements of G.S. 122C-142.2(b) through (f).

When the court finds that there is clear and convincing evidence that there is no medical necessity for the juvenile to remain in the hospital and that the responsible party has not satisfied the requirements of G.S. 122C-142.2(b) through (f), the court may order any of the following:

That the responsible party pay reasonable hospital charges of the juvenile’s continued admission at the hospital. The reasonable charges shall be limited to those incurred after the date it was no longer medically necessary for the juvenile to remain in the hospital.

That the responsible party pay for any damage to property caused by the juvenile incurred after the date it was no longer medically necessary for the juvenile to remain in the hospital.

That the responsible party satisfy the requirements of G.S. 122C-142.2(b) through (f).

Any relief the court finds appropriate.

The order shall be reduced to writing, signed, and entered no later than 72 hours following the completion of the hearing. The clerk of court for juvenile matters shall schedule a subsequent hearing for review within 30 days of entry of the order.

If at any time after the motion is filed, the juvenile is discharged from the hospital and placed by the director, the court shall dismiss the motion.

All parties to the hearing shall bear their own costs.

History.

2021-132, s. 5(b).